Utah statutes.
26-1-11.   Executive director -- Power to amend, modify, or rescind committee rules.

The executive director pursuant to the requirements of the Administrative Rulemaking Act may amend, modify, or rescind any rule of any committee created pursuant to Section 26-1-7 if the rule creates a clear present hazard or clear potential hazard to the public health except that the executive director shall not act until after discussion with the appropriate committee.

